Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4023
Tax Commissioner; adopt rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to administer and enforce the Tobacco Products Tax Act.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 23.